Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 10 Operators’ and Chauffeurs’ Licenses
31-10-38.
Denial, suspension, or revocation of commercial drivers’ school licenses.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles may deny an application for a license or suspend or revoke a license after it has been granted for any of the following reasons:

A material misstatement by the applicant in his or her application for a license or the concealing of a material fact in connection with it.

The applicant or any partner, officer, director, or stockholder in the school had previously held a drivers’ school license or was a partner, officer, director, or stockholder in a school which held a drivers’ school license, and that license was revoked or suspended by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

The applicant or any partner, officer, director, stockholder, or employee in the school was convicted of any felony or misdemeanor.

The applicant fails to furnish satisfactory evidence of good character, reputation, and fitness.

Any willful failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter or with any rule or regulation promulgated by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles establishing instructional standards and procedures.

Any conduct or representation by the applicant or any partner, officer, director, stockholder, or employee in the school tending to give the impression that a license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle or any other license or registration granted by the division of motor vehicles may be obtained by any means other than the means prescribed by law or tending to induce any person to resort to fraudulent representation, circumvention, concealment, or subterfuge in order to secure a license to drive a motor vehicle or motorcycle.

Knowingly employing as an instructor a person who has been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor.

Failure to furnish with the first application a copy of, or thereafter to maintain in force, a standard liability insurance policy approved by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for personal injury to or death of any one person, twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for personal injury to or death of any number of persons involved in any one accident, and five thousand dollars ($5,000) for property damage in any one accident, suffered or caused by reason of the negligence of the applicant or licensee or his or her agent or employee.

The applicant does not hold a currently effective certificate issued by a college or school whose course in basic driver education is approved by the state board of education, manifesting the satisfactory completion of that course.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 224, § 2.

31-10-39.
Instructor’s license required.

No person, unless licensed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, shall be employed by any commercial drivers’ school licensee to give instruction to drive a motor vehicle or motorcycle. An application for an instructor’s license shall contain the name and address of the applicant, the name and address of the school employing the applicant, and any other pertinent information that may be required by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles to safeguard the public interest. Every application shall be verified by the oath or affirmation of the applicant and shall be accompanied by the fee required by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 224, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 62.

31-10-40.
Fee — Expiration of instructor’s license.

The fee for each application for an instructor’s license shall be fifteen dollars ($15.00). The license shall be granted or denied by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles within thirty (30) days after the application and shall expire, unless sooner revoked or suspended, on the thirtieth (30th) day of June following its effective date.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 224, § 2.

31-10-41.
Denial, suspension, or revocation of instructor’s license.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles may deny an application for an instructor’s license or suspend or revoke an instructor’s license after it has been granted for the following reasons:

Any reason set forth in subdivisions (1) — (9) of §

31-10-38

.

The applicant’s driving record shows that he or she is not a careful driver.

The applicant has not attained the age of twenty-one (21) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 224, § 2.

31-10-42.
Hearing on denial, suspension, or revocation of driver’s school or instructor’s licenses — Review.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall notify an applicant for a driver’s school or instructor’s license of the denial of his or her application and a licensee of the proposed suspension or revocation of his or her license by mailing to the applicant or licensee, postage prepaid, a written notice stating the ground or grounds for the denial or proposed suspension or revocation and designating the place and a time not less than five (5) days later for a hearing thereon before the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, if a hearing is requested by the applicant or licensee. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles may adopt reasonable rules and regulations governing the procedure to be followed in any matter that may come before him or her for hearing, may administer oaths, subpoena and examine witnesses, compel the production of documents and other evidence, take depositions of witnesses residing without the state, and order payment of witness fees and mileage, all in the same manner as in civil actions in the superior court. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles, however, shall not be bound by technical rules of evidence.

Any person aggrieved by the denial of an application or the suspension or revocation of a license may, within thirty (30) days from the date the notice is mailed to that person, file in the supreme court a petition, duly verified, for a writ of certiorari, setting forth that the decision is illegal in whole or in part and specifying the grounds of illegality. Upon presentation of that petition, the court may allow a writ of certiorari directed to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles to review the decision of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles and shall prescribe in it the time within which return must be made. The allowance of the writ shall not stay proceedings upon the decision or the effect of them, but the court, upon application of the person aggrieved, may stay those proceedings or the effect of them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 224, § 2.

31-10-43.
Penalties for violations.

Any person violating the provisions of §

31-10-6

,

31-10-35

, or

31-10-39

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200) or be imprisoned not exceeding three (3) months.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 224, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 253, § 1.

31-10-44.
Medical advisory board.

There shall be established within the division of motor vehicles a medical advisory board to function solely as an advisory panel to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles on the subjects of physical and mental fitness standards for licensure to operate a motor vehicle and eligibility standards for disability parking privileges. When any person’s eligibility or continuing eligibility for a license is questioned on the grounds of physical or mental fitness, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles may consult with relevant specialist members of the medical advisory board in determining that person’s qualifications to operate a motor vehicle. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles may also consult with relevant specialist members of the medical advisory board in making determinations of eligibility for disability parking privileges.

In accordance with chapter 35 of title 42, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall establish by regulations functional standards for determining physical and mental fitness for motor vehicle licensure. The promulgated standards will be based on current medical knowledge and objective data regarding fitness to safely operate motor vehicles, and will conform to the requirements of the Americans With Disabilities Acts and chapter 87 of title 42. In developing those functional standards the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall consult with knowledgeable health and rehabilitation professionals including the Medical Society of Rhode Island and the medical advisory board.

The medical board shall consist of a physician in general practice, a neurologist, a psychiatrist, an optometrist, and an orthopedic physician who shall be appointed by the governor; a physician from the Rhode Island department of health designated by the director of health who shall serve ex officio; and two (2) members of the general public approved by the governor, one of whom shall be representative of the elderly, and one of whom shall be representative of the people who are disabled. These members shall be appointed for a period of three (3) years.

Any physician or optometrist who diagnoses a physical or mental condition which in the physician’s or optometrist’s judgment will significantly impair the person’s ability to operate safely a motor vehicle may voluntarily report the person’s name and other information relevant to the condition to the medical advisory board within the division of motor vehicles.

Any physician or optometrist reporting in good faith and exercising due care shall have immunity from any liability, civil or criminal, that otherwise might result by reason of his or her actions pursuant to this section. No cause of action may be brought against any physician or optometrist for not making a report pursuant to this section.

For the purposes of this section, a “physician” is any person practicing medicine requiring a license pursuant to chapter 37 of title 5, and an “optometrist” is any person as defined in §

5-35-1

.

Members of the medical board shall not be compensated for their services on the board. They shall meet at the request of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles at a time convenient to them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 185, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 226, § 22; P.L. 1982, ch. 414, § 13; P.L. 1984, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 502, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 89, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 69; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 69; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 62; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 21, § 27.

31-10-45.
Safety belts.

Each licensee of a driver school shall equip the front seats of school training vehicles with safety belts for the instructor and the student, and the student shall wear a safety belt during road instruction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 422, § 1.

31-10-46.
Driver education course — Credit given.

A driver education student who passes the driver education course but fails the learner’s permit examination shall be given credit for passing the driver education course and need not retake it provided the student within ten (10) days retakes the learner’s permit examination at the division of motor vehicles and passes it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 330, § 1.

31-10-47.
Notification of selective service registration requirement.

Any male, United States citizen or immigrant who is at least eighteen (18) years of age, but less than twenty-six (26) years of age shall be registered in compliance with the requirements of section 3 of the “Military Selective Service Act”, 50 U.S.C. App. 451 et seq., when applying to receive a driver’s license, renewal or identification card or renewal.

The division of motor vehicles shall forward in an electronic format the name, address, date of birth, social security number, if applicable to the applicant, and date of application to the selective service system. The applicant’s submission of the application shall serve as an indication that the applicant has already registered with the selective service or that he is authorizing the department to forward to the selective service the necessary information for such registration. The department shall notify the applicant on the application that his submission of the application will serve as his consent to be registered with the selective service system, if so required by federal law.

The provisions of this section shall apply to male United States citizens or immigrants between the ages of eighteen (18) and twenty-six (26) who are applying for issuance, renewal or duplicate of an instruction permit, a driver’s license, a provisional driver’s license, a commercial driver’s license, or an identification card on or after June 28, 2002.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 374, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 408, § 1.

31-10-48.
Veteran designation on operator license.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall, upon presentation of a United States Department of Defense (DD) FORM 214 or other acceptable documentation of military service and verification of an honorable discharge, issue a motor vehicle operator’s license or commercial driver’s license to the presenter that is clearly marked “veteran.”

The presentment of an operator’s license marked “veteran” shall have the same validity in retail establishments as the presentment of a certified, government-issued military identification card as eligibility for preferential treatment.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 164, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 249, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 225, § 1.